Utah statutes.
76-1-104.   Purposes and principles of construction.
The provisions of this code shall be construed in accordance with these
general purposes.
(1)  Forbid and prevent the commission of offenses.
(2)  Define adequately the conduct and mental state which constitute each
offense and safeguard conduct that is without fault from condemnation as
criminal.
(3)  Prescribe penalties which are proportionate to the seriousness of
offenses and which permit recognition or differences in rehabilitation
possibilities among individual offenders.
(4)  Prevent arbitrary or oppressive treatment of persons accused or convicted
of offenses.
